Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.912

Transfer of powers from superintendent of public instruction and state board of education to state board for community and technical colleges.

All powers, duties, and functions of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education pertaining to projects of adult education, including the state-funded *even start and including the adult education programs operated pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1201 as amended by P.L. 100-297, are transferred to the state board for community and technical colleges. All references to the director or superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the state board for community and technical colleges when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

[ 1991 c 238 s 85.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 28B.06 RCW, project even start, expired August 1, 2015, pursuant to 2015 c 55 s 101.